District of Columbia statutes.
32-1456

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-219, § 7, 62 DCR 9

History